California statutes. Public Resources Code
(d) Agree to comply with such forest land conservation measures and fish and wildlife habitat protection guidelines as may be set forth as part of the cost-sharing agreement or loan agreement executed pursuant to Section 4795 or 4796. Such measures shall be designed to insure that work carried out pursuant to such agreements is conducted in a manner to protect, enhance, and maintain the forest resource system to the greatest degree feasible. In the event that required land conservation measures or fish and wildlife habitat protection guidelines are not followed and significant damage to the forest resources occurs as a result, the director may take corrective action in accordance with the procedures of Sections 4607, 4608, 4609, 4610, and 4611.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

4799.01.

(a) When allocating available funds among projects proposed pursuant to this chapter, the director shall select those projects that, in the judgment of the director, produce the greatest public benefit, giving consideration to both of the following factors:

(1) The need for and potential benefits of forest resource establishment or improvement were the project to be undertaken.

(2) The need for and potential benefits to long-term production, maintenance, and enhancement of the forest resource system resulting from forest land conservation measures, fish and wildlife habitat improvements, or other work.

(b) The director shall give increased preference to projects to the extent that the project applies to forest land that has been substantially damaged by fire, flood, insects, disease, or other natural causes within 36 months of submission of an application pursuant to this chapter.

(c) The director shall also give preference to projects to the extent that each of the following factors are present:

(1) The project involves a substantial amount of followup work.

(2) The project or other actions of the landowner would increase recreational opportunities for the public.

(3) The forest land to which the project applies is equivalent to site quality III or better.

(4) The project would provide relatively more employment opportunities than other proposed projects.

(5) The project is located in a county with high unemployment.

(6) A small business entity will carry out the proposed project.

(d) Consistent with the criteria set forth in subdivisions (a), (b), and (c), the director shall prepare and submit to the board proposed guidelines further specifying the criteria for evaluation and approval of forest resource improvement projects. The board shall review, approve, or amend the guidelines that the director shall follow when carrying out this chapter.

(e) The director shall establish, in consultation with interested persons or agencies and with the review and approval of the board, procedures for the review of proposed forest resource improvement projects. Those procedures shall insure that department specialists and other specialists in the areas of water quality, erosion control, and fish and wildlife protection are integrated into the review of proposed forest resource improvement projects.

(f) No allocation of funds pursuant to this chapter shall, in any fiscal year, exceed the total amount expended during the 1999–2000 fiscal year until the completion, review, and final approval by the board of an updated management plan for the Jackson Demonstration State Forest that complies with applicable state and federal law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 409, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

4799.02.

To carry out the provisions of this chapter and to facilitate participation in the program authorized by this chapter, the director may promulgate such regulations, guidelines, or publications as the director deems appropriate. Such regulations, guidelines, or publications shall be submitted to the board for review or approval when required by this chapter and, even if not required, when deemed appropriate by the director for his or her guidance. Regulations, guidelines, or publications shall specify:

(a) The scope of forest resource improvement work, as described by Section 4794, for which agreements may be entered into or loans made pursuant to Section 4795 or 4796.

(b) The prevailing cost of performing various types and methods of forest resource improvement work under various site conditions throughout the forest land of the state, as required by Sections 4795 and 4796.

(c) Cost share percentage schedules as required by Section 4795.

(d) Procedures to be followed in the event of a violation of a cost-sharing or loan agreement pursuant to Section 4795 or 4796 or default of payment of loan principal or interest pursuant to Section 4796.

(e) Consistent with subdivision (g) of Section 4793, criteria to determine forest lands which have demonstrated potential for improved forest resource management and may, therefore, be eligible for forest resource improvement projects under the provisions of paragraph (2) of subdivision (e) of Section 4797.

(f) Factors to be considered and information which should be included in management plans submitted pursuant to Section 4799.

(g) A standard application form for forest resource improvement projects submitted under Section 4795 or 4796.

(h) Forest land conservation measures and fish and wildlife habitat protection guidelines to be followed in the performance of forest resource improvement projects work as provided by Section 4799.

(i) Guidelines for evaluation and approval of proposed forest resource improvement projects as required by subdivision (d) of Section 4799.01.

(j) Procedures for the review by the director and interested persons or agencies of proposed forest resource improvement projects pursuant to subdivision (e) of Section 4799.01.

(k) Such other matters as the director deems necessary for the effective administration of the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

4799.03.

(a) The director shall work cooperatively with other public agencies of local, state, and federal government to encourage such agencies to undertake forest resource improvement work and otherwise accomplish the purposes of this chapter. The director is authorized to enter into contracts or cooperative agreements with such agencies to provide:

(1) Technical assistance.

(2) Necessary supervisorial personnel.

(3) Tree seed, tree cuttings, or seedlings.

(4) Necessary equipment.

(5) Such other assistance as may be necessary and appropriate to accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(b) In carrying out the provisions of this chapter, the director shall cooperate with the Employment Development Department, the California Conservation Corps, the Cooperative Extension, resource conservation districts, industry, and other interested agencies or persons for the purpose of training needed workers and facilitating wherever feasible the creation of forest resources improvement work opportunities. The department or other state agencies are authorized to utilize state lands for the purposes of carrying out needed training pursuant to this subdivision.

(c) The director shall also endeavor to work cooperatively with other persons and public agencies to provide opportunities for voluntary, unpaid forest resources improvement work by persons who may be interested in volunteering for such work.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

4799.04.

To effectuate the purposes of this chapter, the department is authorized to:

(a) Collect or contract for adequate supplies of high-quality seed and take whatever steps are necessary to insure to the maximum degree feasible that seeds or seedlings planted as part of forest resource improvement projects undertaken pursuant to this chapter are adapted to the planting site and measures are taken to assure appropriate diversity of forest species.

(b) Contract for seedling production and, in cooperation with other state, local, and federal agencies, encourage the production of seedlings needed to accomplish reforestation in the state by small business entities in or near areas where planting will be carried out.

(c) Provide technical assistance to private seedling nurseries and conduct a program for certification of the quality and adaptability of seeds and tree seedlings supplied for forest resource improvement projects undertaken pursuant to this chapter.

(d) Increase availability of genetically improved seed and planting stock by expansion of seed orchards or other recognized tree improvement techniques.

(e) In cooperation with other public and private entities or persons:

(1) Conduct necessary research and take other appropriate measures to protect the genetic integrity and diversity of forest tree species, including, but not limited to, a seed depository.

(2) Conduct research and make grants or enter into contracts or cooperative agreements with public and private entities or persons concerning measures to increase the contribution of trees to improve the natural environment and economy of the state and measures to otherwise accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(f) Purchase necessary equipment or materials and, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act (commencing with Section 18570 of the Government Code), appoint such deputies, officers, and other employees as may be necessary.

(g) In cooperation with other public and private entities and persons, establish such training and educational programs as may be appropriate to increase the number of workers with necessary skills to carry out seed collection, seedling production, and forest resource improvement projects.

(h) To accept grants and donations of equipment, seedlings, materials, or funds from any source for the purpose of supporting or facilitating forest resource improvement work undertaken pursuant to the provisions of this chapter. Any funds received shall be deposited by the director in the Forest Resource Improvement Fund established pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 4799.13) of this part. No federal funds received as part of the American Recovery and Reinvestment Act (Public Law 111- 5) shall be deposited into the Forest Resources Improvement Fund.

(i) Waive the landowner cost sharing requirements of this chapter if the funding source for the authorized forest improvement work prohibits cost sharing requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, 4th Ex. Sess., Ch. 11, Sec. 7.   Effective July 28, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

4799.05.

(a) (1) The director may provide grants to, or enter into contracts or other cooperative agreements with, entities, including, but not limited to, private or nongovernmental entities, Native American tribes, or local, state, and federal public agencies, for the implementation and administration of projects and programs to improve forest health and reduce greenhouse gas emissions.

(2) (A) The director may authorize advance payments to a nonprofit organization, a local agency, a special district, a
 private forest landowner, or a Native American tribe from a grant awarded pursuant to this section. No single advance payment shall exceed 25 percent of the total grant award.

(B) (i) The grantee shall expend the funds from the advance payment within six months of receipt, unless the department waives this requirement.

(ii) The grantee shall file an accountability report with the department four months from the date of receiving the funds and every four months thereafter.

(C) (i) The department shall provide a report to the Legislature on or before January 1, 2023, on the outcome of the department’s use of advance payments.

(ii) A report submitted pursuant to this subparagraph shall be submitted in compliance
 with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(iii) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under clause (i) is inoperative on January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code.

(b) Any project or program described in this section that is funded with moneys from the Greenhouse Gas Reduction Fund, created pursuant to Section 16428.8 of the Government Code, shall comply with all statutory and program requirements applicable to the use of moneys from the fund.

(c) Moneys appropriated to the department for landscape-scale projects shall be allocated as follows:

(1) To subsidize the removal of small diameter material, especially surface fuels and ladder fuels, as well as dead trees, in order to help develop markets for beneficial uses
 of the material, including, but not limited to, animal bedding, biochar, cross-laminated timber, mulch, oriented strand board, pulp, post, shredding, and veneer products.

(2) For multiple benefit projects, such as tree thinning, carbon sequestration, forest resilience, and improved ecological outcome projects, including, but not limited to, restoring watershed health and function and supporting biodiversity and wildlife adaptation to climate change. The department shall give grant funding priority to landowners who practice uneven aged forest management with a resilient forest of diverse age, size, and species class within the boundaries of the project and whose activities are conducted pursuant to an approved timber harvest plan, nonindustrial timber harvest plan, or working forest management plan. An application for a grant for a project under this
 paragraph shall include a description of how the proposed project will increase average stem diameter and provide other site-specific improvement to forest complexity, as demonstrated by the expansion of the variety of tree age classes and species persisting for a period of at least 50 years. The department shall also give funding priority to landowners who agree to long-term forest management goals prescribed by the department.

(3) For activities on national forest lands to increase tree stand heterogeneity, create forest openings of less than one acre, and increase average tree stand diameter of residual trees. Any grants provided under this paragraph shall be approved by the department, in
 collaboration with appropriate state agencies, including the State Air Resources Board.

(d) (1) Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) does not apply to prescribed fire, reforestation, habitat restoration, thinning, or fuel reduction projects, or to related activities included in the project description, undertaken, in whole or in part, on federal lands to reduce the risk of high-severity wildfire that have been reviewed under the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42 U.S.C. Sec.
 4321 et seq.) if either of the following is satisfied:

(A) The primary role of a state or local agency is providing funding or staffing for those projects.

(B) A state or local agency is undertaking those projects pursuant to the federal Good Neighbor Authority (Public Law 113-79) or a stewardship agreement with the federal government entered into pursuant to Public Law 113-79.

(2) Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) does not apply to the issuance of a permit or other project approval by a state or local agency for projects described in paragraph (1).

(3) This section does not alter, affect, or in any way diminish the authority of a state or local agency to impose mitigation measures or conditions on
 projects described in paragraph (1) pursuant to other laws or regulations.

(4) (A) If the lead agency, as defined in Section 21067, determines that a project is not subject to Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) pursuant to this subdivision and it determines to approve or carry out the project, the lead agency shall file a notice of exemption with the Office of Planning and Research and with the county clerk in the county in
 which the project will be located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21108 or subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152. The lead agency shall also post the notice of exemption on its internet website together with a description of where the documents analyzing the environmental impacts of the project under the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 are available for public review.

(B) If the lead agency is not the department, the lead agency shall also provide the notice of exemption together with the information set forth in subdivision (d) of Section 4137 to the department. The department shall compile the information submitted to it pursuant to this subparagraph and post the information on the department’s internet website.

(5) On or before February 1, 2027, if the Secretary of the Natural Resources Agency
 determines that substantial changes have been made since January 1, 2023, to the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 or other federal laws that affect the management of federal forest lands in California, the secretary shall report those changes to the Legislature in accordance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(6) This subdivision shall become inoperative on January 1, 2028.

(e) Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) does not apply to any discretionary approval necessary to carry out or implement projects funded by the Nature-Based Solutions Tribal Program or the tribal cultural burn and tribal wildfire funding authorized by Schedule (2) of Item 3540-101-0001 of Section 2.00 of the Budget Act of 2021, as added by Section 46
 of Chapter 240 of the Statutes of 2021. This subdivision only applies to projects carried out on lands subject to the jurisdictional control or the ownership of a California Native American tribe, as defined in Section 21073.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 574, Sec. 17.   (AB 211)   Effective September 27, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Urban Forestry [4799.06. - 4799.12.1.]

4799.06.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the California Urban Forestry Act of 1978.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 1181.)
-------------------------------------------

4799.07.

The Legislature finds and declares that:

(a) Trees are a vital resource in the urban environment and as an important psychological link with nature for the urban dweller.

(b) Trees are a valuable economic asset in our cities. They help maintain or increase property values, attract business and new residents in urban areas, and support job creation and business growth.

(c) Trees play an important role in energy conservation by modifying temperature extremes with shade and humidity, and by influencing wind direction and velocity. This role is
 particularly important in reducing the amount of energy consumed in heating and cooling buildings and homes, and potentially in producing a local fuel and energy source.

(d) Trees directly reduce air pollution by removing airborne particulates from the atmosphere and helping to purify the air.

(e) Trees help reduce noise, provide habitat for songbirds and other wildlife, reduce surface runoff and protect urban water resources, and enhance the aesthetic quality of life in urban communities.

(f) Trees planted in urban settings play a significant role in meeting the state’s greenhouse gas emission reduction targets by sequestering carbon as well as reducing energy consumption.

(g) Maximizing the benefits of trees through multiple-objective projects that provide environmental services can provide cost-effective solutions to the needs of urban communities and local agencies, including, but not limited to, increased water supply, clean air and water, reduced energy use, flood and stormwater management, recreation, and urban revitalization.

(h) Growing conditions in urban areas for trees and associated plants have worsened so that many of California’s urban communities are now losing more trees than are replaced.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 720, Sec. 1.   (AB 1530)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4799.08.

(a) The purpose of this chapter is to:

(1) Promote the use of urban forest resources for purposes of increasing integrated projects with multiple benefits in urban
 communities, including, but not limited to, the following:

(A) Expanded urban forest canopy.

(B) Community greening.

(C) Increased carbon sequestration.

(D) Reduced energy consumption.

(E) Reduction of impacts of the urban heat island effect.

(F) Improved management of stormwater and dry weather runoff.

(G) Improved local water capture and efficient use of water for urban forest maintenance.

(H) Climate adaptation, with an emphasis on disadvantaged communities. 

(2) Stop the decline of our urban forest resources, facilitate the planting of trees in urban communities, and improve the quality of the environment in urban areas through the establishment and improved management of urban forest resources.

(3) Facilitate the creation of permanent jobs in tree maintenance and related urban forestry activities in neighborhood, local, and regional urban areas to enable workforce training for young women and men in disadvantaged communities.

(4) Optimize the potential of tree and vegetative cover in reducing energy consumption and producing fuel and other products.

(5) Encourage the coordination of state and local agency activities in urban forestry and related programs and encourage maximum community participation in their development and implementation.

(6) Assist the Department of Agriculture to prevent the introduction and spread within this state of known and potentially damaging or devastating invasive pests and diseases.

(7) Reduce or eliminate tree loss resulting from invasive pests and diseases.

(8) Promote policies and incentives for implementing entities that advance improved
 maintenance of urban forest canopy to optimize multiple benefits.

(b) In implementing this chapter, the department shall consult with the State Water Resources Control Board to identify additional opportunities to improve water resources management through urban forestry projects.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 720, Sec. 2.   (AB 1530)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4799.09.

As used in this chapter the following terms have the following meanings:

(a) “Disadvantaged community” means a community identified as a disadvantaged community pursuant to Section 39711 of the Health and Safety Code.

(b) “Local water” means rainwater, stormwater, recycled water, and urban runoff captured by urban forest sites through curb cuts, cisterns, tree wells, and other best management practices that offset reliance on potable water use.

(c) “Low-income community” means a community as defined in Section 39713 of the Health and Safety Code.

(d) “Urban area” means an urban place, as that term is defined by the United States Department of Commerce, of 2,500 or more persons.

(e) “Urban forest” means those native or introduced trees and related vegetation in the urban and near-urban areas, including, but not limited to, urban watersheds, soils and related habitats, street trees, park trees, residential trees, natural riparian habitats, and trees on other private and public properties.

(f) “Urban forest maintenance” means those activities that reduce tree mortality, ensure optimal tree health, preserve carbon sequestration and climate resilience benefits, and improve the full functionality of the urban forest. This includes, but is not limited to, mulching,
 watering, and proper pruning practices.

(g) “Urban forestry” means the cultivation and management of native or introduced trees and related vegetation in urban areas for their present and potential contribution to the economic, physiological, sociological, and ecological well-being of urban society.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 720, Sec. 3.   (AB 1530)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4799.10.

(a) (1) The department shall implement a program in urban forestry to encourage better tree management and planting in urban areas to increase integrated, multiple benefit projects by assisting urban areas with innovative solutions to problems, including reductions in the emissions of greenhouse gases, mitigation of public health impacts of poor air and water quality, mitigation of urban heat island effect, improved capture of stormwater and dry weather runoff, addressing water shortages, lack of green space, lack of urban parks that are accessible to pedestrians, vandalism, and insufficient tree maintenance, and to otherwise accomplish the purposes of this chapter.

(2) The department shall encourage demonstration projects that maximize the benefits of urban forests in conjunction with state
 and local agency programs to improve carbon sequestration, water conservation, energy conservation, stormwater capture and reuse, urban forest maintenance, urban parks and river parkways, school construction and improvements, school greening or sun-safe schoolyards, air quality, water quality, flood management, urban revitalization, solid waste prevention, and other projects.

(3) The department shall establish local or regional targets for urban tree canopy, with emphasis on disadvantaged communities that tend to be most vulnerable to urban heat island effect. These targets shall include urban forest diversity, tree species’ adaptability to anticipated climate change impacts, and other relevant factors.

(4) The department shall assume the primary responsibility in carrying
 out the intent of this chapter in cooperation with statewide and regional urban forestry organizations or associations and arboricultural organizations or associations, other private and
 public entities or persons, and appropriate local, state, and federal agencies, including, but not limited to, the Department of Water Resources, the California Environmental Protection Agency, the Department of Fish and Game, the Department of Food and Agriculture, regional water quality control boards, regional and local air districts, the University of California Cooperative Extension, the Department of Parks and Recreation, the Department of Transportation, resource conservation districts, and the United States Forest Service.

(b) (1) The department shall be the agent of the state and shall have full power to cooperate with those agencies of the federal government that have powers and duties concerning urban forestry
 and shall perform all things necessary to secure the benefits of federal urban forestry programs.

(2) To facilitate implementation of this chapter, the director may enter into agreements and contracts with a public or private organization including a local agency that has urban forestry-related jurisdictional responsibilities and an established and operating urban forestry program. The director shall consult with those agencies when carrying out this chapter in their respective areas.

(c) The director shall take all feasible steps to prevent or retard the introduction, establishment, and spread of known or potentially damaging or devastating pests and diseases. Any agreement shall ensure that the department will not need additional funds to participate in the
 program.

(d) The department and the Department of Food and Agriculture shall cooperate in setting quarantine boundary lines and in enforcing the provisions relating to quarantine and pest abatement contained in Division 4 (commencing with Section 5001) of the Food and Agricultural Code when a quarantine is established to
 prevent the spread of introduced pests and diseases affecting the state’s urban forests.

(e) Whenever it is feasible to do so, the department may utilize inmates and wards assigned to conservation camps or the California Conservation Corps or certified Community Conservation Corps in implementing this chapter.

(f) The department may utilize available recipients of CalWORKs or the General Assistance Program, who are participating in state or county work experience programs for carrying out the purposes of this chapter. The participation of registrants for the welfare-to-work program under the CalWORKs program, under Article 3.2 (commencing with Section 11320) of Chapter 2 of Part 3 of Division 9 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, shall be consistent with their participant
 contract requirements. A person being utilized by the department pursuant to this subdivision shall not be placed in the same crew as persons utilized pursuant to subdivision (e).

(g) The department shall develop or update regulations as necessary to implement the requirements of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 720, Sec. 4.   (AB 1530)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4799.10.2.

(a) (1) The department shall complete a statewide strategic plan, in consultation with nonprofit organizations, cities, counties, other local governments of urban areas, and disadvantaged and low-income
 communities, to achieve a 10-percent increase of tree canopy cover in urban areas by 2035, with priority for increasing tree canopy cover in disadvantaged and low-income communities and low-canopy areas. The statewide strategic plan shall include recommendations for all of the following:

(A) State and local policies necessary to achieve the goal of increasing tree canopy cover in urban areas by 10 percent by 2035.

(B) Targets and actions for canopy increase to be completed at the regional level by 2030 in a manner that is consistent with
 paragraph (3) of subdivision (a) of Section 4799.10 and that supports the 2035 statewide goal.

(C) Local resources needed for the maintenance and upkeep of urban forests and strategies to secure these resources.

(D) Resources and strategies to address threats to urban forests, including climate change, extreme weather, pollution, drought and limited water resource availability, diseases, and pests.

(E) Sustainable tree canopy expansion within disadvantaged communities and low-income communities.

(F) Measures to reduce or eliminate net loss of any existing tree canopy.

(2) The statewide strategic plan completed by the department pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted to the Legislature on or before June 30, 2025.

(b) The statewide strategic plan submitted to the Legislature pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(c) Pursuant to Section 10231.5 of the Government Code, this section shall be repealed on June 30, 2029.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 186, Sec. 1.   (AB 2251)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of June 30, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

4799.11.

(a) The department shall provide technical assistance to urban areas with respect to all of the following:

(1) Planning for regional, county, and local land use analysis projects related to urban forestry.

(2) Preparation of urban tree plans and the selection of trees in landscaping and reforestation efforts.

(3) Development and coordination of training programs for neighborhood and local agency tree planting and maintenance crews.

(4) Advice and guidance to cities, counties, districts, and regional
 entities, homeowner neighborhood groups, and nonprofit organizations on tree disease, insect problems, tree planting, maintenance, and best practices and metrics as developed by the department, for maintaining urban forest health.

(5) The role of forest ecology in planning for the future of urban areas, including climate change and greenhouse gas emission reductions, carbon sequestration, air quality, watershed problems, and energy conservation.

(6) Improvement and enhancement of local water capture for urban forest maintenance.

(7) Retention of native trees and riparian habitats.

(8) Any other matter relating to the purposes of this chapter.

(b) The department and other state agencies are also authorized to assist local tree maintenance and green waste utilization programs by making equipment available on loan where feasible and not detrimental to department or other state agency operations. That equipment may be used only to support regional or local urban forestry efforts consistent with this chapter, including by nonprofit organizations involved in urban tree care or urban green waste utilization efforts.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 720, Sec. 5.   (AB 1530)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4799.12.

The director, with advice from other appropriate state agencies and interested parties, may make grants to provide assistance of 25 to 90 percent of costs for projects meeting guidelines established by the board upon recommendation by the director. The director may waive the cost sharing requirement for projects that are in disadvantaged and low-income communities. Grants may be made to cities, counties, districts, and nonprofit organizations. The director may also waive the cost sharing requirement if the funding source for a grant prohibits cost sharing requirements. The director may authorize advance payments from a grant awarded to a nonprofit
 organization that is located in or providing service to disadvantaged or low-income communities. The advance shall not exceed 25 percent of the total grant award. Contributions required as a condition of grants made pursuant to this section may be made in the form of material, services, or equipment, or funds. Authorized assistance may include, but is not limited to, any of the following needs:

(a) Funding for development of urban tree plans that include coordination of local agency efforts and community involvement.

(b) Funding for development of urban tree plans that include coordination of multiple jurisdictions, multiple agency efforts, and
 community involvement.

(c) Funding for development of urban forest master plans or similar plans designed to provide comprehensive protection, maintenance, and management of the urban forest.

(d) Provision of seedling and tree stock.

(e) Tree planting projects.

(f) Funding and other assistance to local agencies and nonprofit organizations for partnerships as follows:

(1) Energy saving urban forest
 programs.

(2) Developing projects or programs that use urban forests for water conservation, improving water quality, improved water management, or stormwater capture.

(3) Developing projects or programs that use urban forests for air quality improvement, reduction in greenhouse gas emissions, or reduction of urban heat island effect.

(4) Developing community education and engagement programs on the benefits and proper care of trees.

(g) Funding for the development of training and educational materials on the benefits of the urban forest.

(h) Funding for the development of training and
 educational materials on proper care and maintenance of trees and the urban forest, including young and mature tree care.

(i) Funding and other assistance, based on criteria developed by the department, for management of urban forests to ensure their survival and ability to optimize the benefits that urban forests provide the community and the environment.

(j) Funding and other assistance for demonstration projects in urban forestry with special attention given to projects or programs assisting the state in meeting the requirements of the Global Warming Solutions Act of 2006 (Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code), improving energy and water conservation, capturing and filtering urban stormwater and dry weather runoff, improving water
 quality, utilizing local water, reducing the urban heat island effect, improving air quality, and wood and fiber utilization projects, including, but not limited to, biofuel and bioenergy.

(k) Funding for improved urban forest maintenance and projects that respond to events that impact urban forest health, including drought, storms, pests, and disease.

(l) Funding for planning and technical assistance for eligible applicants assisting disadvantaged communities.

(m) Other categories of projects recommended by the director and approved by the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 720, Sec. 6.   (AB 1530)   Effective January 1, 2018.)
-------------------------------------------

4799.12.1.

(a) Moneys appropriated from the California Community and Neighborhood Tree Voluntary Tax Contribution Fund, established pursuant to Section 18735 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, to the department shall be used to fund grants authorized under Section 4799.12. A minimum of 25 percent of the funds shall be used for the needs specified in subdivisions (a), (b), (c), (h), and (k) of Section 4799.12 in low-income or disadvantaged communities.

(b) This section shall become inoperative one year after the date on which Article 4 (commencing with
 Section 18734) of Chapter 3 of Part 10.2 of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code becomes inoperative and is repealed on January 1 of the following year.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 104, Sec. 2.   (SB 347)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Conditionally inoperative on date prescribed by its own provisions.   Repealed on January 1 following the inoperative date.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Forest Resources Improvement Fund [4799.13. - 4799.13.]

4799.13.

(a) There is hereby created in the State Treasury, the Forest Resources Improvement Fund. The money in the Forest Resources Improvement Fund may only be expended, upon appropriation by the Legislature, for the cost of operations associated with management of lands held in trust by the state and operated as demonstration state forests by the department pursuant to Section 4646, including restoration activities, and to reimburse the department’s cost of maintaining and improving the campground facilities, associated recreational facilities, natural environment, and access thereto, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4652.

(b) The Forest Resources Improvement Fund shall be the
 depository for all revenue derived from the repayment of loans made or interest received pursuant to Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 4790), the receipts from the sale of forest products, as defined in Section 4638, from the state forests to support the operations described in subdivision (a), and revenue received from recreational user fees, pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 4652. Money in the fund in excess of the amount needed to support those operations shall be deposited in the General Fund.

(c) The director may accept grants and donations of equipment, seedlings, labor, materials, or funds from any source for the purpose of supporting or facilitating activities undertaken pursuant to this part. Any funds received shall be deposited by the director in the Forest Resources Improvement Fund.

(d) Each proposed expenditure by the department of money from the Forest
 Resources Improvement Fund shall be included as a separate item and scheduled individually in the Budget Bill for each fiscal year for consideration by the Legislature. These appropriations shall be subject to all of the limitations contained in the Budget Bill and to all other fiscal procedures prescribed by law with respect to the expenditure of state funds.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 598, Sec. 2.   (AB 2351)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Energy Production [4799.14. - 4799.16.]

4799.14.
